Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.150

Registration of vital statistics.

The secretary of health shall have charge of the state system of registration of births, deaths, fetal deaths, marriages, and decrees of divorce, annulment and separate maintenance, and shall prepare the necessary rules, forms, and blanks for obtaining records, and insure the faithful registration thereof.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 254; 1979 c 141 s 51; 1967 c 26 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.20.070. Prior: 1907 c 83 s 1; RRS s 6018. Formerly RCW 43.20A.620 and 43.20.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 c 26: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1968." [ 1967 c 26 s 12.]

Vital statistics: Chapter 70.58A RCW.